Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.277

Washington professional educator standards board—Continuing education requirements for administrator and teacher certificate renewals—Approved clock hour providers.

(1) The Washington professional educator standards board must adopt rules for renewal of administrator certificates and teacher certificates that meet the continuing education requirements of this section.

(2) To renew an administrator certificate on or after July 1, 2023, continuing education must meet the following requirements: 10 percent must focus on equity-based school practices, 10 percent must focus on the national professional standards for education leaders, and five percent must focus on government-to-government relationships with federally recognized tribes.

(3) To renew a teacher certificate on or after July 1, 2023, 15 percent of continuing education must focus on equity-based school practices. This subsection (3) does not apply to a person renewing both a teacher certificate and an administrator certificate.

(4)(a) Except as provided under (c) of this subsection (4), continuing education must be provided by one or more of the following entities, if they are an approved clock hour provider:

(i) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(ii) A school district;

(iii) An educational service district;

(iv) A Washington professional educator standards board-approved administrator or teacher preparation program;

(v) The association of Washington school principals;

(vi) The Washington education association; or

(vii) Other organizations approved by the Washington professional educator standards board.

(b) Beginning with the 2025-26 school year, the professional educator standards board must approve clock hour providers under this section through a revised application process. As part of the revised application process, entities must submit an application to the professional educator standards board that, at a minimum, includes the following:

(i) The entity's mission and vision;

(ii) The entity's experience and expertise in providing professional development to educators generally, as well as specific experience and expertise in equity-based practices;

(iii) Possible subject matter topics of continuing education to be provided by the entity;

(iv) Information on clock hour pricing;

(v) Transcript processes; and

(vi) Other application elements deemed appropriate by the professional educator standards board.

(c) To meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, continuing education related to government-to-government relationships with federally recognized tribes must be provided by one or more subject matter experts approved by the governor's office on Indian affairs in collaboration with the tribal leaders congress on education and the office of Native education in the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(d) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the Washington professional educator standards board must maintain a list of subject matter experts approved under (c) of this subsection on their respective websites.

(5) An entity providing an administrator or teacher continuing education program focused on equity-based school practices or the national professional standards for education leaders must publicly post the learning objectives of the program on its website. If the entity does not have a website, it must post the learning objectives of the program in a conspicuous place in the entity's main office and submit a copy of the learning objectives to the Washington professional educator standards board.

(6) Continuing education focused on equity-based school practices must be aligned with the standards of practice developed by the Washington professional educator standards board under RCW 28A.410.260.

[ 2024 c 221 s 1; 2021 c 77 s 1.]

NOTES: